Washington statutes.
RCW 41.45.030

State actuary to submit information on the experience and financial condition of each retirement system—Adoption of long-term economic assumptions.

(1) Beginning September 1, 2007, and every two years thereafter, the state actuary shall submit to the council information regarding the experience and financial condition of each state retirement system, and make recommendations regarding the long-term economic assumptions set forth in RCW 41.45.035. The council shall review this and such other information as it may require.

(2) By October 31, 2007, and every two years thereafter, the council, by affirmative vote of four councilmembers, may adopt changes to the long-term economic assumptions established in RCW 41.45.035. Any changes adopted by the council shall be subject to revision by the legislature.

The council shall consult with the economic and revenue forecast supervisor and the executive director of the state investment board, and shall consider long-term historical averages, in reviewing possible changes to the economic assumptions.

(3) The assumptions and the asset value smoothing technique established in RCW 41.45.035, as modified in the future by the council or legislature, shall be used by the state actuary in conducting all actuarial studies of the state retirement systems, including actuarial fiscal notes under RCW 44.44.040. The assumptions shall also be used for the administration of benefits under the retirement plans listed in RCW 41.45.020, pursuant to timelines and conditions established by department rules.

[ 2007 c 280 s 1; 2001 2nd sp.s. c 11 s 5; 1995 c 233 s 1; 1993 c 519 s 17; 1989 c 273 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2001 2nd sp.s. c 11: "Except under section 21 of this act, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2001." [ 2001 2nd sp.s. c 11 s 22.]

Effective date—1995 c 233: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [May 5, 1995]." [ 1995 c 233 s 4.]

Part headings not law—Effective date—1993 c 519: See notes following RCW 28A.400.212.